California, session 20252026, AB2025.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 10140.8 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:10140.8. (a) (1) A real estate broker or salesperson, or person acting on their behalf, who includes a digitally altered image in an advertisement or other promotional material for the sale of real property shall include in the advertisement or promotional material a statement disclosing that the image has been altered and a link to a publicly accessible internet website, URL, or QR code that includes, and clearly identifies, the original, unaltered image. The statement shall be reasonably conspicuous and located on or adjacent to the image and shall include language indicating that the unaltered images can be accessed on the linked internet website, URL, or QR code.(2) If an advertisement or promotional material described in paragraph (1) is posted on an internet website over which the real estate broker or salesperson, or person acting on their behalf, has control, they shall include the unaltered version of the images from which the digitally altered images were created in the posting. A person subject to this paragraph may comply with this requirement by including a link to a publicly accessible internet website that includes, and clearly identifies, the original, unaltered image. If the real estate broker or salesperson, or person acting on their behalf, complies with this requirement by including a link to the unaltered images, the statement required by paragraph (1) shall include language indicating the unaltered images can be accessed on the linked internet website, URL, or QR code.(b) (1) For purposes of this section, “digitally altered image” means an image, created by or at the direction of the real estate broker or salesperson, or person acting on their behalf, that has been altered through the use of photo editing software or artificial intelligence to add, remove, or change elements in the image, including, but not limited to, fixtures, furniture, appliances, flooring, walls, paint color, hardscape, landscape, facade, floor plans, and elements outside of, or visible from, the property, including, but not limited to, streetlights, utility poles, views through windows, and neighboring properties.(2) “Digitally altered image” does not include an image where only lighting, sharpening, white balance, color correction, angle, straightening, cropping, exposure, or other common photo editing adjustments are made that do not change the representation of the real property.(c) This section does not apply to an advertisement or other promotional material for a leasehold exceeding one year’s duration.SECTION 1.SEC. 2. Section 10175.4 is added to the Business and Professions Code, to read:10175.4. A violation of Section 1940.11 of the Civil Code by a licensee shall be deemed a violation of this part.SEC. 2.SEC. 3. Section 1940.11 is added to the Civil Code, to read:1940.11. (a) For purposes of this section:(1) “Capture device” has the same meaning as defined in Section 22757.1. 22757.1 of the Business and Professions Code.(2) (A) “Digitally altered image” means an image created by or at the direction of a person that has been altered through the use of photo editing software or artificial intelligence to add, remove, or change elements in the image, including, but not limited to, fixtures, furniture, appliances, flooring, walls, paint color, hardscape, landscape, facade, floor plans, and elements outside of, or visible from, the property, including, but not limited to, streetlights, utility poles, views through windows, and neighboring properties.(B) “Digitally altered image” does not include an image where only lighting, sharpening, white balance, color correction, angle, straightening, cropping, exposure, or other common photo editing adjustments are made that do not change the representation of the real property.(b) (1) A person who includes a digitally altered image in an advertisement or other promotional material for rental of real property shall include in the advertisement or promotional material a statement disclosing disclosure that the image has been altered and a link to a publicly accessible internet website, URL, or QR code that includes, and clearly identifies, the original, unaltered image. The statement altered. The disclosure shall be reasonably conspicuous and located on or adjacent to the image and shall include language indicating that the unaltered images can be accessed on the linked internet website, URL, or QR code. image.(2) If an (A) An advertisement or promotional material described in paragraph (1) is posted on an internet website over which a person has control, they shall include the unaltered version of the images from which the digitally altered images were created in the posting. A person subject to this paragraph may comply with this requirement by including a link to a publicly accessible internet website that includes, and clearly identifies, the original, unaltered image. If the person complies with this requirement by including a link to the unaltered images, the statement disclosure required by paragraph (1) shall include language indicating the unaltered images can be accessed on the linked internet website, URL, or QR code.(B) Subparagraph (A) does not apply to an image, architectural rendering, or artistic rendering that was not originally created through the use of a capture device.(c)Notwithstanding subdivision (b), an unaltered version of an image required to be made available pursuant to subdivision (b) shall not include an image or architectural or artistic rendering that was not originally created through the use of a capture device.SEC. 3.SEC. 4. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.